Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 29. Financing of Tourism Development

154.29-010.
Definitions for KRS 139.536 and KRS 154.29-010 to 154.29-060. [Repealed and reenacted.]

154.29-020.
Legislative findings. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

154.29-030.
Evaluation standards — Tourism attraction project applications — Consulting services — Cabinet recommendations. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

154.29-040.
Standards for preliminary and final approval of companies and projects. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

154.29-050.
Contracts between authority and approved company. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

154.29-060.
Short title for KRS 139.536 and KRS 154.29-010 to 154.29-060. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]